Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.365

Errors in protection orders.

After a protection order is issued, the court may correct clerical or technical errors in the order at any time. The court may correct errors either on the court's own initiative or upon notice to the court of an error. If the court corrects an error in an order, the court shall provide notice of the correction to the parties and the person who notified the court of the error, and shall provide a copy of the corrected order. The court shall direct the clerk to forward the corrected order on or before the next judicial day to the law enforcement agency specified in the order.

[ 2021 c 215 s 50.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.